Delaware, session 153, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 6, Title 1 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§610. Day of Mourning Due to the Death of a Current or Former President. A federal National Day of Mourning that is declared due to the death of a current or former President of the United States is a legal holiday in this State, and State government offices must be closed.